District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.30

Powers of agents, salaried employees and brokers.

Repealed.

April 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-227, § 16(c), 44 DCR 140
1981 Ed., § 35-1534.
D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(2) ( 44 DCR 1730), eff. May 21, 1997, amends this section subsequent to repeal.